Utah statutes.
77-15-6.   Commitment on finding of incompetency to stand trial --
Subsequent hearings -- Notice to prosecuting attorneys.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), if after hearing, the person is
found to be incompetent to stand trial, the court shall order the defendant
committed to the custody of the executive director of the Department of Human
Services or his designee for the purpose of treatment intended to restore the
defendant to competency.  The court may recommend but not order placement of
the defendant.  The court may, however, order that the defendant be placed in
a secure setting rather than a nonsecure setting.  The director or his
designee shall designate the specific placement of the defendant during the
period of evaluation and treatment to restore competency.
(2)  The examiner or examiners designated by the executive director to assess
the defendant's progress toward competency may not be involved in the routine
treatment of the defendant.  The examiner or examiners shall provide a full
report to the court and prosecuting and defense attorneys within 90 days of
arrival of the defendant at the treating facility.  If any examiner is unable
to complete the assessment within 90 days, that examiner shall provide to the
court and counsel a summary progress report which informs the court that
additional time is necessary to complete the assessment, in which case the
examiner shall have up to an additional 90 days to provide the full report.
The full report shall assess:
(a)  the facility's or program's capacity to provide appropriate treatment for
the defendant;
(b)  the nature of treatments provided to the defendant;
(c)  what progress toward competency restoration has been made with respect to
the factors identified by the court in its initial order;
(d)  the defendant's current level of mental disorder or mental retardation
and need for treatment, if any; and
(e)  the likelihood of restoration of competency and the amount of time
estimated to achieve it.
(3)  The court on its own motion or upon motion by either party or by the
executive director may appoint additional mental health examiners to examine
the defendant and advise the court on his current mental status and progress
toward competency restoration.
(4)  Upon receipt of the full report, the court shall hold a hearing to
determine the defendant's current status.  At the hearing, the burden of
proving that the defendant is competent is on the proponent of competency.
Following the hearing, the court shall determine by a preponderance of
evidence whether the defendant is:
(a)  competent to stand trial;
(b)  incompetent to stand trial with a substantial probability that the
defendant may become competent in the foreseeable future; or
(c)  incompetent to stand trial without a substantial probability that the
defendant may become competent in the foreseeable future.
(5) (a)  If the court enters a finding pursuant to Subsection (4)(a), the
court shall proceed with the trial or such other procedures as may be
necessary to adjudicate the charges.
(b)  If the court enters a finding pursuant to Subsection (4)(b), the court
may order that the defendant remain committed to the custody of the executive
director of the Department of Human Services or his designee for the purpose
of treatment intended to restore the defendant to competency.
(c)  If the court enters a finding pursuant to Subsection (4)(c), the court
shall order the defendant released from the custody of the director unless the
prosecutor informs the court that commitment proceedings pursuant to Title
62A, Chapter 5, Services to People with Disabilities, or Title 62A, Chapter
15, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Act, will be initiated.  These
commitment proceedings must be initiated within seven days after the court's
order entering the finding in Subsection (4)(c), unless the court enlarges the
time for good cause shown.  The defendant may be ordered to remain in the
custody of the director until commitment proceedings have been concluded.  If
the defendant is committed, the court which entered the order pursuant to
Subsection (4)(c), shall be notified by the director at least 10 days prior to
any release of the committed person.
(6)  If the defendant is recommitted to the department pursuant to Subsection
(5)(b), the court shall hold a hearing one year following the recommitment.
(7)  At the hearing held pursuant to Subsection (6), except for defendants
charged with the crimes listed in Subsection (8), a defendant who has not been
restored to competency shall be ordered released or temporarily detained
pending civil commitment proceedings under the same terms as provided in
Subsection (5)(c).
(8)  If the defendant has been charged with aggravated murder, murder,
attempted murder, manslaughter, or a first degree felony and the court
determines that the defendant is making reasonable progress towards
restoration of competency at the time of the hearing held pursuant to
Subsection (6), the court may order the defendant recommitted for a period not
to exceed 18 months for the purpose of treatment to restore the defendant to
competency with a mandatory review hearing at the end of the 18-month period.
(9)  Except for defendants charged with aggravated murder or murder, a
defendant who has not been restored to competency at the time of the hearing
held pursuant to Subsection (8) shall be ordered released or temporarily
detained pending civil commitment proceedings under the same terms as provided
in Subsection (5)(c).
(10)  If the defendant has been charged with aggravated murder or murder and
the court determines that he is making reasonable progress towards restoration
of competency at the time of the mandatory review hearing held pursuant to
Subsection (8), the court may order the defendant recommitted for a period not
to exceed 36 months for the purpose of treatment to restore him to competency.
(11)  If the defendant is recommitted to the department pursuant to Subsection
(10), the court shall hold a hearing no later than at 18-month intervals
following the recommitment for the purpose of determining the defendant's
competency status.
(12)  A defendant who has not been restored to competency at the expiration of
the additional 36-month commitment period ordered pursuant to Subsection (10)
shall be ordered released or temporarily detained pending civil commitment
proceedings under the same terms as provided in Subsection (5)(c).
(13)  In no event may the maximum period of detention under this section
exceed the maximum period of incarceration which the defendant could receive
if he were convicted of the charged offense.  This Subsection (13) does not
preclude pursuing involuntary civil commitment nor does it place any time
limit on civil commitments.
(14)  Neither release from a pretrial incompetency commitment under the
provisions of this section nor civil commitment requires dismissal of criminal
charges.  The court may retain jurisdiction over the criminal case and may
order periodic reviews to assess the defendant's competency to stand trial.
(15)  A defendant who is civilly committed pursuant to Title 62A, Chapter 5,
Services to People with Disabilities, or Title 62A, Chapter 15, Substance
Abuse and Mental Health Act, may still be adjudicated competent to stand trial
under this chapter.
(16) (a)  The remedy for a violation of the time periods specified in this
section, other than those specified in Subsection (5)(c), (7), (9), (12), or
(13), shall be a motion to compel the hearing, or mandamus, but not release
from detention or dismissal of the criminal charges.
(b)  The remedy for a violation of the time periods specified in Subsection
(5)(c), (7), (9), (12), or (13) shall not be dismissal of the criminal
charges.
(17)  In cases in which the treatment of the defendant is precluded by court
order for a period of time, that time period may not be considered in
computing time limitations under this section.
(18)  At any time that the defendant becomes competent to stand trial, the
clinical director of the hospital or other facility or the executive director
of the Department of Human Services shall certify that fact to the court.  The
court shall conduct a hearing within 15 working days of the receipt of the
clinical director's or executive director's report, unless the court enlarges
the time for good cause.
(19)  The court may order a hearing or rehearing at any time on its own motion
or upon recommendations of the clinical director of the hospital or other
facility or the executive director of the Department of Human Services.
(20)  Notice of a hearing on competency to stand trial shall be given to the
prosecuting attorney.  If the hearing is held in the county where the
defendant is confined, notice shall also be given to the prosecuting attorney
for that county.
